Utah statutes.
34-34-14.   Jurisdiction.
The jurisdiction of any action brought to enforce this chapter is hereby
conferred upon and vested in the district court of the county in which any
person, group of persons, firm, association, corporation, labor union, labor
organization or any other type of association, or representatives thereof, who
violates this chapter, or any part of it, resides or has a place of business,
or may be found and served with process.
